Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 35 HOSPITALS FOR INDIGENT SICK
§ 31-3506. Obligated county.

The county obligated for payment shall be determined as follows:

The obligated county for payment of pharmaceuticals for noninstitutionalized individuals shall be the county where the applicant currently resides.

The obligated county for payment of necessary medical services for medical indigent individuals shall be as follows:

The last county in which the applicant or head of household has maintained a residence for six (6) consecutive months or longer within the past five (5) years preceding incurrence shall be obligated. If the applicant or head of household maintains another residence in a different county or state for purposes of employment, the county where the family residence is maintained shall be deemed the applicant’s or head of household’s place of residence.

If an individual has not resided in any county for a period of six (6) months within the five (5) years preceding incurrence of medical costs for which counties have a responsibility in whole or in part, then the county where the applicant maintained a residence for at least thirty (30) days immediately preceding such incurrence shall be the obligated county.

Active military duty, or being admitted as a patient in a hospital, nursing home, other medical facility or institution, shall not change the obligated county. The county obligated shall remain the same county that would have been obligated prior to institutionalization as above described.

For full-time students at public institutions of higher learning, the obligated county shall be the county of residence of the applicant unless an obligated person, for whom the applicant is claimed as a dependent, resides in another county or state.

If an individual has not resided in any county for a consecutive period of thirty (30) days but has resided in the state of Idaho for a consecutive period of thirty (30) days then the county where the individual last resided prior to receiving medical services shall be the obligated county.

§ 31-3507. Transfer of a medically indigent patient.

An obligated county or the board shall have the right to have an approved medically indigent resident transferred to a hospital or facility, in accordance with requirements of the federal emergency medical treatment and active labor act, 42 U.S.C., section 1395dd; provided however, treatment for the necessary medical service must be available at the designated facility, and the county contract physician, or the attending physician if no county contract physician is available, must certify that the transfer of such person would not present a significant risk of further injury. The obligated county, the board, and hospital from which or to which a person is taken or removed as herein provided, as well as the attending physician(s), shall not be liable in any manner whatsoever and shall be immune from suit for any causes of action arising from a transfer performed in accordance with this section. The immunities and freedom from liability granted pursuant to this section shall extend to any person, firm or corporation acting in accordance with this section.

§ 31-3508. Limitations on payments for necessary medical services.

Each hospital and provider seeking reimbursement under the provisions of this chapter shall fully participate in the utilization management program and third party recovery system.

The board and the county shall determine the amount to be paid based on the application of the appropriate reimbursement rate to those medical services determined to be necessary medical services. The board may use contractors to undertake utilization management review in any part of that analysis. The bill submitted for payment shall show the total provider charges less any amounts which have been received under any other federal or state law. Bills of less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall not be presented for payment.

§ 31-3508A. Payment for necessary medical services by an obligated county.

Upon receipt of a final determination by the county commissioners approving an application for financial assistance under the provisions of this chapter, an applicant, or the third party applicant on behalf of the applicant, shall, within sixty (60) days, submit any remaining medical claims pursuant to the procedures provided in chapter 15, title 31, Idaho Code.

Payment shall be made to hospitals or providers on behalf of an applicant and shall be made on the next payment cycle. In no event shall payment be delayed longer than sixty (60) days from receipt of the county claim.

Payment to a hospital or provider pursuant to this chapter shall be payment of the debt in full and the provider or hospital shall not seek additional funds from the applicant.

Within fourteen (14) days after the county payment, the clerk of the obligated county shall forward to the board any application for financial assistance exceeding, at the reimbursement rate, the total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate per resident in any consecutive twelve (12) month period. A copy of the clerk’s findings, the final decision of the county commissioners and a statement of which costs the clerk has paid shall be forwarded with the application to the board.

§ 31-3509. Administrative offsets and collections by hospitals and providers.

Providers and hospitals shall accept payment made by an obligated county or the board as payment in full. Providers and hospitals shall not bill an applicant or any other obligated person for services that have been paid by an obligated county or the board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for any balance on the amount paid.

Hospitals and providers making claims for reimbursement of necessary medical services provided for medically indigent residents shall make all reasonable efforts to determine liability and attempt to collect for the account so incurred from all resources prior to submitting the bill to the county commissioners for review. In the event that a hospital or a provider has been notified that a recipient is retrospectively eligible for benefits or that a recipient qualifies for approval of benefits, such hospital(s) or provider(s) shall submit or resubmit a bill to third party insurance, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, other insurance and/or other third party sources for payment within thirty (30) days of such notice. A hospital shall apply pursuant to section 1011 of the medicare modernization act of 2003 if funds are available or provide proof that funds are no longer available. In the event any payments are thereafter received for charges which have been paid by a county and/or the board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, said sums up to the amount actually paid by the county and/or the board shall be paid over to such county and/or board within sixty (60) days of receiving such payment from other resources.

Any amount paid by an obligated county or the board under the provisions of this chapter, which amount is subsequently determined to have been an overpayment, shall be an indebtedness of the hospital or provider due and owing to the obligated county and the board. Such indebtedness may include circumstances where the applicant is subsequently determined to be eligible for third party insurance, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, other insurance or other third party sources.

The obligated county and the board shall have a first lien prorated between such county and the board in proportion to the amount each has paid. The obligated county and the board may request a refund from a hospital or provider in the amount of the overpayment, or after notice, recover such indebtedness by deducting from and setting off the amount of the overpayment to a hospital or provider from any outstanding amount or amounts due and payable to the same hospital or provider pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

§ 31-3510. Right of subrogation.

Upon payment of a claim for necessary medical services pursuant to this chapter, the obligated county and the board making such payment shall become jointly subrogated to all the rights of the hospital and other providers and to all rights of the medically indigent resident against any third parties who may be the cause of or liable for such necessary medical services. The board may pursue collection of the county’s and the board’s subrogation interests.

Upon any recovery by the recipient against a third party, the obligated county and the board shall pay or have deducted from their respective subrogated portion thereof, a proportionate share of the costs and attorney’s fees incurred by the recipient in obtaining such recovery, provided that such proportionate share shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the subrogated interest unless one (1) or more of the following circumstances exist:

Otherwise agreed.

If prior to the date of a written retention agreement between the recipient and an attorney, the obligated county and the board have reached an agreement with the third party, in writing, agreeing to pay in full the county and the board’s subrogated interest.

The obligated county and the board shall have joint subrogated interests in proportion to the amount each has paid.

§ 31-3510A. Reimbursement.

Receipt of financial assistance pursuant to this chapter shall obligate an applicant to reimburse the obligated county and the board for such reasonable portion of the financial assistance paid on behalf of the applicant as the county commissioners may determine that the applicant is able to pay from resources over a reasonable period of time. Cash amounts received shall be prorated between the county and the board in proportion to the amount each has paid.

A final determination shall not relieve the applicant’s duty to make additional reimbursement from resources if the county commissioners subsequently find within a reasonable period of time that there has been a substantial change in circumstances such that the applicant is able to pay additional amounts up to the total claim paid on behalf of the applicant.

A final determination shall not prohibit the county commissioners from reviewing a petition from an applicant to reduce an order of reimbursement based on a substantial change in circumstances.

The automatic lien created pursuant to the chapter may be filed and recorded in any county of this state wherein the applicant has resources and may be liquidated or unliquidated in amount. Nothing herein shall prohibit an applicant from executing a consensual lien in addition to the automatic lien created by filing an application pursuant to this chapter. In the event that resources can be located in another state, the clerk may file the lien with the district court and provide notice to the recipient. The recipient shall have twenty (20) days to object, following which the district court shall enter judgment against the recipient. The judgment entered may thereafter be filed as provided for the filing of a foreign judgment in that jurisdiction.

The county shall have the same right of recovery as provided to the state of Idaho pursuant to sections 56-218 and 56-218A, Idaho Code.

The county commissioners may require the employment of such of the medically indigent as are capable and able to work and whose attending physician certifies they are capable of working.

That portion of the moneys received by a county as reimbursement that are not assigned to the catastrophic health care cost program shall be credited to the respective county medically indigent fund.

If, after a hearing, the final determination of the county commissioners is to require a reimbursement amount or rate the applicant believes excessive, the applicant may seek judicial review of the final determination of the county commissioners in the manner provided in section 31-1506, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3511. Violations and penalties.

Any applicant or obligated person who willfully gives false or misleading information to the department, board, a hospital, a county or an agent thereof, or to any individual in order to obtain financial assistance under this chapter as or for a medically indigent resident, or any person who obtains financial assistance as a medically indigent resident who fails to disclose insurance, worker’s compensation, resources, or other benefits available to him as payment or reimbursement of such expenses incurred, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable under the general provisions for punishment of a misdemeanor. In addition, any applicant or obligated person who fails to cooperate with the department, board or a county or makes a material misstatement or material omission to the department in a request for medicaid eligibility determination, pursuant to section 31-3504, Idaho Code, or a county in an application pursuant to this chapter shall be ineligible for nonemergency assistance under this chapter for a period of two (2) years.

Neither the county commissioners nor the board shall have jurisdiction to hear and shall approve a completed application for necessary medical services unless an application in the form prescribed by this chapter is received by the clerk or the board in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The county commissioners may deny an application if material information required in the application or request is not provided by the applicant or a third party or if the applicant has divested himself or herself of resources within one (1) year prior to filing an application in order to become eligible for assistance pursuant to this chapter. An applicant who is sanctioned by federal or state authorities and loses medical benefits as a result of failing to cooperate with the respective agency or making a material misstatement or material omission to the respective agency shall be ineligible for assistance pursuant to this chapter for the period of such sanction.

If the county commissioners fail to act upon an application within the timelines required under this chapter, the application shall be deemed approved and payment made as provided in this chapter.

An applicant may appeal a decision rendered by the county commissioners pursuant to this section in the manner provided in section 31-1506, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3512. Joint county hospitals.

Recognizing the need of hospitals for the public welfare and the burden for one (1) county to finance the cost of such construction, operation and maintenance thereof within its own boundaries under certain circumstances, the county commissioners in their respective counties shall have the power to jointly and severally enter into contracts or agreements with one (1) or more adjoining counties to construct, operate and maintain joint county hospitals, either within or without the boundaries of such counties, upon a finding of each such county commissioners that there is a public necessity requiring the financing of such hospital facilities jointly with one (1) or more adjoining counties. The county commissioners shall have the same powers to operate, finance and bond for such joint county hospitals as they would have for a county hospital.

§ 31-3513. Election for issuance of bonds.

The county commissioners may, when they deem the welfare of their counties require it, or when petitioned thereto by a number of resident taxpayers of their respective counties equal to five percent (5%) of the number of persons voting for the secretary of state of the state of Idaho, at the election next preceding the date of such petition, submit to the qualified electors of said county at any election held as provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, the proposition whether negotiable coupon bonds of the county to the amount stated in such proposition shall be issued and sold for the purpose of providing such hospital, hospital grounds, nurses’ homes, nursing homes, residential or assisted living facilities, shelter care facilities, medical clinics, superintendent’s quarters, or any other necessary buildings, and equipment, and may on their own initiative submit to the qualified electors of the county at any general election the proposition whether negotiable coupon bonds of the county to the amount stated in such proposition shall be issued and sold for the purpose of providing for the extension and enlargement of existing hospital, hospital grounds, nurses’ homes, nursing homes, residential or assisted living facilities, shelter care facilities, medical clinics or grounds, superintendent’s quarters, or any other necessary buildings, and equipment, and when authorized thereto by two-thirds (2/3) vote at such election, shall issue and sell such coupon bonds and use the proceeds therefrom for the purposes authorized by such election. Said proposition may be submitted to the qualified electors at an election held subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, if the county commissioners shall by resolution so determine. No person shall be qualified to vote at any election held under the provisions of this section unless he shall possess all the qualifications required of electors under the general laws of this state.

§ 31-3514. Internal management — Accounts and reports.

Such facilities as referred to in section 31-3503(2)[(4)], Idaho Code, may suitably provide for and accept other patients and must charge and accept payments from such other patients as are able to make payments for services rendered and care given. The county commissioners may make suitable rules and regulations for the management and operation of such property by a suitable board of control, or otherwise, or for carrying out such hospital uses and purposes under a lease of the same.

The boards or officers or lessees of such hospital property shall render accounts and reports to the county commissioners as may be required by the county commissioners; and shall render accounts and deliver over any and all moneys received by them for the county to the county treasurer to be credited to the operation expense of hospitals and indigent sick and otherwise dependent poor of the county in such manner as provided by law for the handling of funds of this kind.

Said board of control may permit persons from out of the county where such hospital is located to be admitted for hospitalization to such hospital. As to such cases special rates for the use and service of such hospital may be provided which rates shall apply equally to all such patients who do not pay taxes within the county where such hospital is located. The purpose of providing such special rates shall be to compel persons living out of the county where such hospital is located, and who receive hospitalization in such hospital, to bear a just burden of the cost of construction and maintenance of such hospital.

§ 31-3515. Lease or sale.

Such counties acting through their county commissioners shall have the right to lease such hospitals upon such terms and for such a length of time as they may decide, or to sell the same; provided, however, that no such lease or sale, except those leases entered into between such counties and the Idaho health facilities authority as provided in section 31-836, Idaho Code, shall be final or valid unless and until it has been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of said county voting on such question at an election held subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code; except if a hospital district has been created under the provisions of chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code, county commissioners shall have the right to lease, as provided in section 31-836, Idaho Code, such hospitals within a created hospital district to the hospital district without submitting the question of lease or sale to the qualified electors of the county or the respective hospital district.

§ 31-3515A. Conveyance, lease of county hospital to nonprofit corporation.

As an alternative to the procedure set forth in section 31-3515, Idaho Code, counties acting through their respective county commissioners may convey or lease county hospitals, and the equipment therein, subject to the following conditions:

The entity to which the hospital is to be transferred shall be a nonprofit corporation;

No lease term shall exceed ninety-nine (99) years. This subsection supersedes that part of section 31-836, Idaho Code, which is inconsistent herewith;

The governing body of the nonprofit corporation must be composed initially of the incumbent members of the board of hospital trustees, as individuals. The articles of incorporation must provide for a membership of the corporation which is:

Broadly representative of the public and includes residents of each incorporated city in the county and of the unincorporated area of the county; or

A single nonprofit corporate member having articles of incorporation which provide for a membership of that corporation which is broadly representative of the public and includes residents of each incorporated city in the county and of the unincorporated area of the county.

The nonprofit corporation must provide care for indigent patients, and receive any person falling sick or maimed within the county.

The transfer agreement must provide for the transfer of patients, staff and employees, and for the continuing administration of any trusts or bequests or maintenance of records pertaining to the existing public hospital.

The transfer or lease agreement shall provide for a transfer or lease price which shall be either of the following:

The acceptance of all assets and assumption of all liabilities; or

Such other price as the commissioners and the nonprofit corporation may agree.

If any hospital which has been conveyed pursuant to this section ceases to be used as a nonprofit hospital, unless the premises so conveyed are sold and the proceeds used to erect or enlarge another nonprofit hospital for the county, the hospital so conveyed reverts to the ownership of the county. If any hospital which has been leased pursuant to this section ceases to be used as a nonprofit hospital, the lease shall terminate.

The provisions of section 31-808, Idaho Code, with respect to the sale and disposition of real and personal property owned by the county, shall not apply to transactions covered by section 31-3515, Idaho Code, and this section.

The articles must further provide for the selection of the governing body by the membership of the corporation, or exclusively by a parent corporation which is the corporate member, with voting power, and not by the governing body itself, except to fill a vacancy for the unexpired term. The articles must further provide that no member of the governing body shall serve more than two (2) consecutive three (3) year terms.

§ 31-3516. Separability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

§ 31-3517. Establishment of a catastrophic health care cost program.

The governing board of the catastrophic health care cost program created by the counties pursuant to a joint exercise of powers agreement, dated October 1, 1984, and serving on June 30, 1991, is hereby continued as such through December 31, 1992, to complete the affairs of the board, to continue to pay for those medical costs incurred by participating counties prior to October 1, 1991, until all costs are paid or the moneys in the catastrophic health care cost account contributed by participating counties are exhausted, and to pay the balance of such contributions back to the county of origin in the proportion contributed. County responsibility shall be limited to the first eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) per claim. The remainder of the eligible costs of the claim shall be paid by the state catastrophic health care cost program.

Commencing October 1, 1991, a catastrophic health care cost program board is hereby established for the purpose of administering the catastrophic health care cost program. This board shall consist of twelve (12) members, with six (6) county commissioners, one (1) from each of the six (6) districts or regions established by the Idaho association of counties, four (4) members of the legislature, with one (1) each being appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate, the leader of the minority party of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the leader of the minority party of the house of representatives, one (1) member appointed by the director of the department and one (1) member appointed by the governor.

The county commissioner members shall be elected by the county commissioners of the member counties of each district or region, with each board of county commissioners entitled to one (1) vote. The process and procedures for conducting the election and determining the members shall be determined by the board itself, except that the election must be conducted, completed and results certified by December 31 of each year in which an election for members is conducted. The board recognized in subsection (1) of this section shall authorize and conduct the election in 1991.

The term of office of a member shall be two (2) years, commencing on January 1 next following election or appointment, except that for commissioner members elected in 1991, the commissioner members from districts or regions 1, 3 and 5 shall serve for a term of one (1) year, and the commissioner members from districts or regions 2, 4 and 6 shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Members may be reelected or reappointed. Election or appointment to fill vacancies shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

The board shall have an executive committee consisting of the chair, vice chair, secretary and such other members of the board as determined by the board. The executive committee may exercise such authority as may be delegated to it by the board between meetings.

The member appointed by the governor shall be reimbursed as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, from the catastrophic health care cost account.

The board shall meet at least once each year at the time and place fixed by the chair. Other necessary meetings may be called by the chair by giving notice as may be required by state statute or rule. Notice of all meetings shall be given in the manner prescribed by law.

Except as may otherwise be provided, a majority of the board constitutes a quorum for all purposes, and the majority vote of the members voting shall constitute the action of the board. The secretary of the board shall take and maintain the minutes of board proceedings. Meetings shall be open and public except the board may meet in closed session to prepare, approve and administer applications submitted to the board for approval by the respective counties.

At the first meeting of the board in January of each year, the board shall organize by electing a chair, a vice chair, a secretary and such other officers as desired.

All moneys received or expended by the program shall be audited annually by a certified public accountant, designated by the governing board, who shall furnish a copy of such audit to the director of legislative services.

The board shall submit a request to the governor and the legislature in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35, title 67, Idaho Code, for an appropriation for the maintenance and operation of the catastrophic health care cost program.

§ 31-3518. Administrative responsibility.

The board shall, in order to facilitate payment to providers participating in the county medically indigent program and the catastrophic health care cost program, have on file the reimbursement rates allowed for all participating providers of medical care and authorized by this chapter. However, in no event shall the amount to be paid exceed the usual, reasonable, and customary charges for the area.

The board may contract with independent contractors to provide services to manage and operate the catastrophic health care cost program, or the board may contract for or appoint agents, employees, professional personnel and any other personnel to manage and operate the catastrophic health care cost program.

The board shall develop rules for the catastrophic health care cost program after consulting with the counties, organizations representing the counties, health care providers, hospitals and organizations representing health care providers and hospitals.

The board shall submit all proposed rules to the legislative council for review prior to adoption, in a manner substantially the same as proposed executive agency rules are reviewed under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Following adoption, the board shall submit all adopted rules to the legislature for review in a manner substantially the same as adopted executive agency rules are reviewed under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The legislature, by concurrent resolution, may modify, amend, or repeal any rule of the board.

§ 31-3519. Approval and payment by the board.

Upon receipt of the clerk’s statement, a final determination of the county commissioners and the completed application, the board shall approve an application for financial assistance under the catastrophic health care cost program if it determines that:

Necessary medical services have been provided for a medically indigent resident in accordance with this chapter;

The obligated county paid the first eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) of necessary medical services; and

The cost of necessary medical services when paid at the reimbursement rate exceeds the total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate per resident in any consecutive twelve (12) month period.

Payment to a hospital or provider pursuant to this chapter shall be payment of the debt in full and the hospital or provider shall not seek additional funds from the applicant.

In no event shall the board be obligated to pay a claim, pursuant to this chapter, in excess of an amount based on the application of the appropriate reimbursement rate to those medical services determined to be necessary medical services. The board may use contractors to undertake utilization management review in any part of that analysis.

The board shall, within forty-five (45) days after approval by the board, submit the claim to the state controller for payment. Payment by the state controller shall be made pursuant to section 67-2302, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3520. Contract for provision of necessary medical services for the medically indigent.

The county commissioners in their respective counties, may contract for the provision of necessary medical services to the medically indigent and may, by ordinance, limit the provision of and payment for nonemergency necessary medical services to a contract provider. They shall require the contractor to enter into a bond to the county with two (2) or more approved sureties, in such sum as the county commissioners may fix, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties and obligations as such contractor, and require him to report to the county commissioners quarterly all persons committed to his charge, showing the expense attendant upon their care and maintenance.

§ 31-3521. Employment of physician.

The county commissioners may employ a physician to attend, when necessary, the patients of the county hospital, provided however, that the county commissioners may enter into contracts with groups of licensed physicians for medical attendance upon patients of the county hospital or other persons receiving medical attendance at county expense. They may provide for the employment, at some kind of manual labor, of such of the patients as are capable and able to work and the attending physicians must certify to the person in charge or lessee of the county hospital the names of such of the patients as are incapable of manual labor, and when any such patient becomes capable the physician shall certify that fact.

§ 31-3522 — 31-3528. Application for county aid. [Repealed.]

§ 31-3529 — 31-3549. [Reserved.]

It is the declaration of the legislature to be in the public interest to encourage nonlitigation resolution of claims between the counties and health providers of the state of Idaho by providing for prelitigation screening of such claims contesting indigent resource eligibility by a hearing panel as provided in this chapter.

§ 31-3551. Advisory panel for prelitigation consideration of indigent resource eligibility claims — Procedure.

The counties in the state of Idaho and the health providers furnishing care to eligible medically indigent persons, as defined in section 31-3502, Idaho Code, are directed to cooperate in providing an advisory panel in the nature of a special civil grand jury and procedure for prelitigation consideration of claims arising out of contested resource availability of persons applying for indigent relief under the provisions of chapter 35, title 31, Idaho Code, which proceedings shall be informal and nonbinding, but nevertheless compulsory as a condition precedent to litigation. Proceedings conducted or maintained under the authority of this chapter shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. Formal rules of evidence shall not apply and all such proceedings shall be expeditious and informal. The panel, thus created, will render opinions where the resource eligibility of applicants, as herein described, has been contested.

§ 31-3552. Appointment and composition of advisory panel.

The panel will consist of three (3) members to be designated as follows: the chairman of the panel shall be an appointed designee by and of the director of the department of health and welfare of the state of Idaho, and must be without bias or conflict of interest; one (1) member will be appointed by and represent the Idaho association of counties; and one (1) member will be appointed by and represent the Idaho hospital association. All panelists shall serve under oath that they are without bias or conflict of interest as respects any matter under consideration.

§ 31-3553. Advisory decisions of panel.

The general responsibility of the advisory panel will be to consider the eligibility of applicants on claims referred to them and render written opinions regarding such eligibility of applicants as based upon review of analysis of the resources available to the applicant, as defined in section 31-3502, Idaho Code. Following proceedings on each claim, the advisory panel shall provide the affected parties with its comments and observations with respect to the claim. They shall indicate in such comments whether the applicant appears to have resources available to him or her sufficient to pay for necessary medical services; does not have adequate resources; or any comments or observations which may be relevant and appropriate. The findings of the advisory panel may be used by affected parties in resolving contested claims in a manner consistent with the findings presented. However, such findings will be advisory in nature only and not binding on any of the affected parties.

§ 31-3554. Tolling of limitation periods during pendency of proceedings.

There shall be no judicial or other review or appeal of such matters. No party shall be obligated to comply with or otherwise be affected or prejudiced by the proposals, conclusions or suggestions of the panel or any member or segment thereof; however, in the interest of due consideration being given to such proceedings and in the interest of encouraging consideration of claims informally and without the necessity of litigation, the applicable statute of limitations shall be tolled and not deemed to run during the time that such a claim is pending before the panel and for thirty (30) days thereafter.

§ 31-3555. Stay of court proceedings in interest of hearing before panel.

During said thirty (30) day period neither party shall commence or prosecute litigation involving the issues submitted to the panel and the district or other courts having jurisdiction of any such pending claims shall stay proceedings in the interest of the conduct of such proceedings before the panel.

§ 31-3556. Expenses for advisory panel members.

Expenses incurred by the members of the advisory panel in the performance of their duties will be borne by the respective organizations making the appointment.

§ 31-3557. Frequency of and agenda for meetings.

Frequency of and agenda for meetings of the advisory panel will be subject to the discretion of the chair, based upon criteria to be established by the members of the panel. However, there shall be no more than four (4) meetings of the panel per year.

§ 31-3558. Nondisclosure of personal identifying information.

Personal identifying information about a particular utilization management reviewer or practitioner engaged by the department or the board shall not be disclosed without the prior written authorization of the reviewer or practitioner. Notwithstanding this nondisclosure of personal identifying information, redacted copies of all reports and recommendations of the department’s or the board’s utilization management reviewers or practitioners shall be maintained in the official record of the respective county commissioners and the board as described in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and chapter 15, title 31, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3550. Declaration of public policy.